Wyoming, session 2026, SF0048.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-4-1101 through 35-4-1106 are
created to read:
ARTICLE 11
STEM CELL FREEDOM ACT
35-4-1101. Short title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Stem Cell
Freedom Act."
35-4-1102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(i) "Current good manufacturing practices" means
the quality, safety and manufacturing practice standards
employed under this act that are consistent with applicable
federal law;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0048
ENROLLED ACT NO. 31, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) "Institutional review board" means a group
duly constituted and currently registered in accordance
with applicable federal law that provides initial approval
and continuing oversight of the stem cell therapies being
offered under this act, including adverse event reporting
and the approval of a form to be used for informed consent
between a physician and patient or the patient's legal
representative prior to the use of stem cell therapy;
(iii) "Investigational drug, biological product
or device" means a drug, biological product or device that
has successfully completed phase one (1) of a clinical
trial but has not yet been approved for general use by the
United States food and drug administration and remains
under investigation in a clinical trial;
(iv) "Physician" means a person licensed to
practice medicine by the state board of medicine pursuant
to title 33, chapter 26 of the Wyoming statutes.
"Physician" shall not include a physician assistant as
defined by W.S. 33-26-501(a)(iii);
(v) "Stem cell therapy" means treatment
involving the use of autologous mesenchymal stem cells,
including but not limited to the collection, processing,
cultural expansion, manufacturing, storage and therapeutic
use of stem cells. "Stem cell therapy" shall not include,
whether directly or indirectly, the use of any biological
material derived from an abortion;
(vi) "This act" means W.S. 35-4-1101 through
35-4-1106.
35-4-1103. Access to stem cell therapy; conditions;
insurance coverage.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0048
ENROLLED ACT NO. 31, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 35-7-118 and any other law
to the contrary, a patient may receive, and a physician may
perform, stem cell therapy that has not been approved by
the United States food and drug administration if:
(i) The therapy is conducted in accordance with
a current institutional review board approval or is an
investigational drug, biological product or device;
(ii) The stem cells are manufactured and handled
in accordance with current good manufacturing practice
standards;
(iii) A physician-patient relationship exists
between the physician administering the stem cell therapy
and the person receiving the therapy;
(iv) The physician is registered with the
Wyoming state board of medicine to provide stem cell
therapy pursuant to this act;
(v) The patient or legally recognized
representative of the patient has provided written informed
consent acknowledging:
(A) The nature and character of the
proposed stem cell therapy;
(B) That stem cell therapy is not approved
by the United States food and drug administration;
(C) The potential benefits, risks and
complications associated with stem cell therapy and the
procedure to be performed; and
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0048
ENROLLED ACT NO. 31, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(D) The financial responsibility of the
patient or legally recognized representative of the patient
in paying for the stem cell therapy to be received.
(b) Stem cell therapy provided pursuant to this act
shall be administered by a physician or under the direct
supervision of a physician. Activities other than the
actual administration of the stem cells to the patient
shall be supervised by a physician.
(c) No person authorized under this act to perform
stem cell therapy or manufacture stem cells shall be
obligated by this act to provide stem cell therapy or stem
cells but may do so according to the person's own
discretion and judgment.
(d) A health carrier as defined by W.S.
26-13-303(a)(iii) may but shall not be required to provide
coverage for costs associated with stem cell therapy.
(e) This act shall not prohibit the performing of any
stem cell therapy or activity otherwise allowed by law. A
person shall not perform, advertise or represent that the
person is providing stem cell therapy under this act if the
person does not comply with the provisions of this act.
35-4-1104. Action against physician license
prohibited.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Wyoming
state board of medicine shall not revoke, fail to renew,
suspend or take any other action against a physician's
license based solely on the physician's recommendations to
a patient regarding access to or treatment with stem cell
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0048
ENROLLED ACT NO. 31, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
therapy or the performance of stem cell therapy, provided
that the recommendations or procedures are consistent with
medical standards of care and that the physician is
registered with the Wyoming state board of medicine to
provide stem cell therapy under this act.
35-4-1105. Access to stem cell therapy.
An official, employee or agent of this state or any
political subdivision of this state shall not prohibit or
attempt to prohibit a patient's access to stem cell
therapy. Counseling, advice or a recommendation consistent
with medical standards of care from a licensed health care
provider shall not constitute a violation of this section.
35-4-1106. No cause of action created.
This act shall not create a private cause of action against
any person involved in the care of any patient using stem
cell therapy or the manufacturing of stem cells if the
person is complying with the requirements of this act and
medical standards of care.
Section 2. W.S. 33-26-202(b) by creating a new
paragraph (xx) is amended to read:
33-26-202. Board; duties; general powers.
(b) The board is empowered and directed to:
(xx) Operate and publish a public registry of
qualified physicians registered to perform stem cell
therapy pursuant to the Stem Cell Freedom Act.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0048
ENROLLED ACT NO. 31, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6